Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1934
Registered office; registered agent.

Each corporation must continuously maintain in this state:

(1) A registered office with the same street address as that of the registered agent. A post office box number may be provided in addition to the street address of the registered agent; and

(2) A registered agent, who may be:

(i) An individual who resides in this state and whose office is identical with the registered office;

(ii) A domestic business or nonprofit corporation whose office is identical with the registered office; or

(iii) A foreign business or nonprofit corporation authorized to transact business in this state whose office is identical with the registered office.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 34;

Laws 2008, LB379, § 8.